California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Certificates of Convenience [1685. - 1698.]

1685.

The commissioner may issue to an eligible person a certificate of convenience to act as any of the following:

(a) Any type of a licensee under this chapter or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1800), or Part 5 (commencing with Section 121401) of Division 2 to administer the business of a licensed person who has died or who has been declared incompetent by the judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. That certificate of convenience may be denominated an estate certificate of convenience.

(b) Any type of a licensee under this chapter or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), Chapter 7
 (commencing with Section 1800), or Part 5 (commencing with Section 121401) of Division 2 to conserve the business of a licensed natural person who enters the military service of the United States or to conserve the business of an organization under the conditions specified in Section 1697. That certificate of convenience may be denominated a military service certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 20.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1686.

To be eligible for an estate certificate of convenience, a person shall be one of the following:

(a) The executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or life agent.

(b) If no executor or administrator has been appointed, the surviving spouse or heir otherwise entitled to conduct the business of the deceased property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or life agent.

(c) The conservator of the estate of a property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or life agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 21.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1687.

Except as provided in Section 1637, to be eligible for a military service certificate of convenience, a person is required to be nominated therefor by the holder of a permanent license who, while the holder, entered the military service of the United States. “Military service” has the meanings ascribed to it by Section 101 of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act of 2003 (Public Law 108-189).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 21.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1693.

An estate certificate of convenience expires upon the happening of any of the following events, whichever occurs first:

(a) Upon the filing with the commissioner of a certified copy of an order appointing an executor or administrator, if the certificate of convenience has been issued to a person other than the person so appointed executor or administrator.

(b) Upon the filing with the commissioner of a certified copy of an order appointing a new conservator of the estate of a property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or life agent.

(c) Upon the disposal of the business of the property
 broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or life agent who is deceased or for whom a conservator of the estate has been appointed.

(d) Upon the expiration of one year after the death of the deceased property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or life agent; provided, however, that if during the said year the holder of the certificate of convenience files an application for a license to act as a property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or life agent in the individual capacity of the holder, then the certificate of convenience may remain in force until the holder thereof has been given an opportunity to take the qualifying examination for the license.

(e) Upon the termination of the conservatorship of the estate of the property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or life
 agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 13.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1694.

A military service certificate of convenience shall terminate upon the relicensing of the nominating licensee, but in no event shall it remain in force beyond the period set forth in Section 1722.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1697.

A military service certificate of convenience may be issued to an organization only under the following circumstances:

(a) Such organization is the holder of a permanent license, and

(b) The person entering the military service of the United States is the only natural person named on the license of such organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 220.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.

The military service certificate of convenience referred to in Section 1697 expires at one of the following times, whichever occurs first:

(a) Upon the qualification of a natural person to be named on the permanent license of the organization; or

(b) Six months after the issuance of the certificate of convenience.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Issuance of Licenses [1702. - 1707.7.]

1702.

All licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall be issued to the holder thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 543.)
-------------------------------------------

1703.

Every applicant for an original license under this chapter, Chapter 5A (commencing with Section 1759), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1800) shall, as part of the application, endorse an authorization for disclosure to the commissioner of financial records of any fiduciary funds as defined in Section 1733, pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code. The authorization shall continue in force and effect for so long as the licensee continues to be licensed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 300, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1704.

(a) Any person acting as a licensee under this chapter shall not act as an agent of an insurer unless the insurer has filed with the commissioner a notice of appointment, executed by the insurer, appointing the licensee as the insurer’s agent. Every property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, personal lines broker-agent, or limited lines automobile insurance agent acting in the capacity of an insurance solicitor shall have filed on his or her behalf with the commissioner a notice executed by an insurance agent or insurance broker appointing and agreeing to employ the solicitor as an employee within this state. Additional notices of appointment may be filed by other insurers before the license is issued and thereafter as long as the license remains in force. The authority to transact
 insurance given to a licensee by an insurer, property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, personal lines broker-agent, or limited lines automobile insurance agent, as the case may be, by appointment shall be effective as of the date the notice of appointment is signed. That authority to transact shall apply to transactions occurring after that date and for the purpose of determining the insurer’s, property broker-agent’s, casualty broker-agent’s, personal lines broker-agent’s, or limited lines automobile insurance agent’s liability for acts of the appointed licensee. No notice of appointment of a life agent, property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, personal lines broker-agent, limited lines automobile insurance agent, or travel insurance agent shall be filed under this subdivision unless the licensee being appointed has consented to that filing. Each appointment made under this subdivision shall by its terms continue in force until:

(1) The cancellation or expiration of the license applied for or held at the time the appointment was filed.

(2) The filing of a notice of termination by the insurer or employing property broker-agent or casualty broker-agent, or by the appointed life agent, property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, travel insurance agent, or insurance solicitor.

(b) Upon the termination of all appointments, or all endorsements naming the licensee on the license of an organization licensee, and the cancellation of the bond required pursuant to Section 1662 if acting as a broker, the permanent license shall not be canceled, but shall become inactive. It may be renewed pursuant to Section 1718. It may be reactivated at any time prior to its expiration by the filing of a new appointment pursuant to this section, Section 1707, and Section 1751.3, or the filing of a new bond pursuant
 to Section 1662. An inactive license shall not permit its holder to transact any insurance for which a valid, active license is required.

(c) Upon the termination of all appointments of a person licensed under a certificate of convenience, that certificate shall be canceled and shall be returned by its lawful custodian to the commissioner.

(d) A property broker-agent or a casualty broker-agent appointing an insurance solicitor pursuant to this section, if a natural person, shall be the holder of a permanent license to act as such a broker-agent or the holder of a certificate of convenience so to act issued pursuant to either subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1685. If the property broker-agent or the casualty broker-agent is an organization, it shall be the holder of a permanent license.

(e) The filing of an
 incomplete or deficient action notice with the department shall require the filing of an amended, complete action notice, together with the payment of the fee therefor specified in subdivision (l) of Section 1751.

(f) A notice of appointment appointing a solicitor may be filed by a second or subsequent property broker-agent or casualty broker-agent. The broker-agent seeking to appoint the solicitor shall enter into an agreement with all other property broker-agents and casualty broker-agents with whom the insurance solicitor has an existing appointment. The agreement shall govern how the broker-agents will determine on which property broker-agent’s or casualty broker-agent’s behalf the solicitor is working when dealing with individuals who are customers of none of the property broker-agents and casualty broker-agents with whom the solicitor has an appointment. If the agreement does not identify which broker-agent or broker-agents are liable for
 the act of the solicitor, all property broker-agents and casualty broker-agents with whom the solicitor is appointed at the time of the act shall be jointly and severally liable for that act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 29.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1704.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a licensed life agent may present a proposal for insurance to a prospective policyholder on behalf of a life insurer for which the life agent is not specifically appointed, and may also transmit an application for insurance to that insurer. If a policy of insurance is issued pursuant to that application, the insurer is considered to have authorized the agent to act on its behalf, and the insurer is responsible for all actions of the agent that relate to the application and policy as if the agent had been duly appointed for the insurer. Not more than 14 days after the life agent submits an application for insurance to the insurer for which the insurer issues a policy, the insurer shall forward to the commissioner a notice of appointment of the life agent as the insurer’s agent in accordance with the requirements of this article. Nothing in this section obliges an insurer to accept an application for underwriting from a life agent. Any payments made by the prospective policyholder prior to issuance of the policy shall be made only in the form of a draft, check, cashier’s check, traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument made payable to the insurer to which the application is transmitted.

(b) A licensed life agent who is not specifically appointed for a particular life insurer may not (1) present a proposal to a prospective policyholder for insurance with that insurer or (2) transmit an application for insurance to that insurer if the insurer requires all its life agents to represent only that insurer or a group of affiliated insurers of which that insurer is a member or to submit risks to that insurer or group of affiliated insurers prior to submitting them to other insurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1420, Sec. 39.   Operative January 1, 1992, by Sec. 77 of Ch. 1420.)
-------------------------------------------

1705.

An insurer, or employing property broker-agent or casualty broker-agent, by filing a notice of appointment on behalf of an applicant for an original license pursuant to Section 1704, and who is not then licensed pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1800), shall be deemed by that act to have declared that:

(a) The applicant is of good reputation.

(b) The applicant is worthy of the license sought.

An insurer, property broker-agent, or casualty broker-agent, by filing a notice of appointment on behalf of an applicant for an original
 license to act as a life agent, property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or insurance solicitor, where the applicant for any reason will not be issued a certificate of convenience pending examination under Article 8 (commencing with Section 1685), shall be deemed to have declared that the applicant has had experience or instruction in classes of insurance, the transaction of which is authorized by the license sought, or will be given the necessary instruction within 30 days after the issuance of the license.

Should the applicant for a life agent, property broker-agent, or casualty broker-agent license be a copartnership, corporation, or association, the insurer filing the appointment shall be deemed to have made the declarations set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section as regards both the business organization and each natural person whose name appears in the application as one to exercise the agency powers of the license sought. The insurer shall
 be deemed to have made the declaration in the preceding paragraph only as regards the natural person or persons to be named on the organization’s license initially.

Whenever a copartnership, corporation, or association licensed as a life agent, property broker-agent, or casualty broker-agent files to add to any such license the name of a natural person to exercise the agency powers thereunder, the business organization shall be deemed to have made the appropriate declarations regarding the natural person, as set forth in this section, as are required of an insurer filing a notice of appointment on behalf of an applicant for an original license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 24.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1707.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 1704.5, each notice of appointment or notice of termination of appointment filed pursuant to this article shall be filed on forms prescribed by the commissioner within 15 days of appointment or termination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1707.5.

The commissioner in lieu of retaining in his or her files a copy of the notices of appointment or notices of termination described in Section 1707, if he or she has made entry of the facts pertaining to the appointments or terminations or the statements, including the cancellation, if any thereof, in some portion of his or her official records, may at any time thereafter destroy the documents. The commissioner’s certification as to the content of such an entry shall be competent evidence of the facts therein stated for any purpose in any court or administrative action or proceeding and shall be accepted in lieu of the actual documents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1420, Sec. 42.   Operative January 1, 1992, by Sec. 77 of Ch. 1420.)
-------------------------------------------

1707.51.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, qualified applicants who applied in proper form and requested an examination date for a property, casualty, or life insurance license prior to December 1, 1991, shall be provided the opportunity to qualify for licensure under statutory licensure provisions in effect on December 31, 1991.

(b) The department may require the applicant to execute a sworn statement subject to a penalty of perjury and denial of license declaring that they meet the qualifications set forth in subdivision (a). The department shall provide public notice as to the availability of these tests and as to the procedure and requirements necessary to qualify for the
 test. The tests shall be administered within 90 days of enactment of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 25.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1707.7.

As part of the report required under Section 12922, the commissioner shall provide the following information for the previous calendar year ending December 31 for five years after the operative date of this section:

(a) The total number of applications filed for a property and casualty broker-agent license, a property broker-agent license, a casualty broker-agent license, a personal lines broker-agent license, a limited lines auto-only agent license, a life agent license, and an accident and health or sickness agent license.

(b) The total number of licensees issued a property and casualty license, a property broker-agent license, a casualty broker-agent license, a personal lines license, a limited lines automobile license,
 a life license, and an accident and health or sickness license.

(c) The total number of licensees with both a life agent license and an accident and health or sickness agent license.

(d) The total justified complaints against the licensees enumerated in subdivision (b) annually for five years.

(e) At the end of five years following the issuance of auto-only agent, life agent, and accident and health or sickness agent licenses, a cumulative summary of the data required by this section compared to the licenses issued for property and casualty broker-agent, property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, personal lines broker-agent, and life agent for the year immediately preceding the creation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 18.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Termination of Licenses [1708. - 1712.5.]

1708.

A licensee may at any time surrender for cancellation any license under which that licensee is permitted to act in any of the capacities specified in this chapter. The licensee may make that surrender by written notice thereof delivered to the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 14.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1710.

All licenses issued to natural persons terminate upon the death of such person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1711.

For the purposes of this chapter and except as provided in this article, an organization ceases to exist as an entity eligible to hold a license:

(a) Upon dissolution of a copartnership or upon any change in membership of a copartnership.

(b) Upon the termination of an association.

(c) Upon dissolution of a corporation.

Provided, however, should a change occur in the membership of a copartnership licensed under this chapter, the surviving or continuing copartnership may continue to transact insurance under the license issued to the predecessor copartnership until action is taken by the commissioner on the application herein prescribed if the following requirements are met:

(1) The surviving or continuing copartnership within 30 days files an application on a form prescribed by the commissioner for registration of the change in membership, and pays the lawful fee therefor and, if acting as an insurance broker, furnishes the bond required under Article 5 (commencing with Section 1662). 

(2) At least one person who exercised the agency or brokership powers of the predecessor copartnership continues to exercise the agency or brokership powers of the surviving or continuing copartnership.

(3) That application for registration be signed by a general partner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1420, Sec. 43.   Operative January 1, 1992, by Sec. 77 of Ch. 1420.)
-------------------------------------------

1712.

The termination of the existence of the license entity as provided in Section 1711, automatically terminates the right of that entity to transact insurance thereunder; except that a natural person, copartnership, association, or corporation licensed under this article, may continue to transact insurance under an existing license in either a different capacity or as a different organization or entity if a natural person is named to exercise the agency or brokerage powers of the license entity, and that natural person remains eligible to be so named, and if no substantial change in ownership and no change in control of the licensed insurance business has taken place; provided, that within 30 days following the change the person or the successor copartnership, association or corporation files a properly completed and executed application in the form prescribed by the commissioner for an appropriate license and pays the lawful fees therefor.

Nothing herein shall be construed to nullify any provision of Section 1718 except that any fee paid as required by subdivisions (a) or (b) of Section 1718 for a license not issued may be applied towards the fee for filing an application under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1420, Sec. 44.   Operative January 1, 1992, by Sec. 77 of Ch. 1420.)
-------------------------------------------

1712.5.

(a) The license of an organization licensed as a property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or life agent shall become inoperative upon the removal or termination of the last natural person named thereon, pursuant to Section 1656.

(b) Unless the license is reactivated by the correction of all deficiencies including, if necessary, the adding of a natural person to transact insurance under the authority of the organization’s license pursuant to Section 1661, the license shall not be renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 18.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. License Terms [1716. - 1723.]

1716.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to any certificate of convenience other than a military service certificate of convenience issued to a natural person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1717.

All licenses issued under this chapter shall be for the license term specified in Section 1630. Such licenses may be issued for all of such term, or, upon application made during any such term, for the balance thereof. Such license term shall commence as specified in Section 1630.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 348, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1717.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the commissioner shall institute year-round licensing of production agency licensees commencing with those license renewals taking place in 1986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 770, Sec. 8.9.)
-------------------------------------------

1718.

(a) Not less than 60 days before a permanent license will expire, the commissioner may use an electronic delivery method, including email or other similar electronic method of delivery, to deliver, or may mail, to the latest email or mailing address appearing on the commissioner’s records, an application to the licensee to renew the license for the appropriate succeeding license term. It is the licensee’s responsibility to renew whether or not a renewal notice is received. The commissioner may accept a late renewal, provided the licensee’s failure to comply is due to clerical error or inadvertence on the part of the department.

(b) Application for renewal of a license may be filed
 on or before the expiration date. When filed under this subdivision, the fee for filing shall be as specified in Section 1750.

(c) The application for renewal of an expired license may be filed after the expiration date and until that same month and day of the next succeeding year. The fee for a renewal application under this subdivision shall be the fee specified in subdivision (b) and a delinquent fee in the amount specified for a one-year period in Section 1750 for the filing. Each licensee shall be subject to payment of delinquent fees under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 15.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1719.

The commissioner shall not issue any permanent license within 30 days prior to the expiration date on record for a previously licensed entity unless the person shall have also filed an application for renewal of the license for that license year or term directly following the expiration date to which the application for renewal relates and shall have paid the fee for filing specified in Section 1750. As to the filing of the renewal application, the provisions of Section 1718 shall not be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 770, Sec. 9.1.)
-------------------------------------------

1720.

(a) A licensee who has applied to renew a license under this chapter shall be entitled to continue operating under the existing license for 60 days after its specified expiration date, or until notified by the department that the renewal application is deficient, whichever comes first, if the applicant has satisfied all license renewal requirements, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The submission of the applicable renewal application and fee on or before the expiration date of the license.

(2) The satisfaction of all required continuing education or training requirements.

(b) This section shall not apply to any license that is suspended or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 312, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1722.

If a natural person while licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1800), or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831) of this part, Part 5 (commencing with Section 12140) of Division 2, or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 5 enters the military service of the United States and is in that service at a time prescribed for the filing of a renewal application, the filing of that application is waived, and the license held by that licensee at the time of the licensee’s entry into military service shall remain in force during the period of that military service and until the end of the license year in which the licensee is
 released from that service, but not for less than six months after that release. During that period, the licensee may secure a license of the type held by the licensee upon entry into military service upon the filing of an application and paying the fee therefor without the necessity of taking an examination or paying a penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 502, Sec. 1.   (SB 240)   Effective October 3, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1723.

(a) At the time any original or renewal license application that is submitted to the commissioner shows a conviction of the applicant of a felony involving dishonesty or breach of trust, or of a violation of Section 1033 of Title 18 of the United States Code, the commissioner shall either commence a proceeding pursuant to Section 1668 or 1669, or Section 1738 in the case of a renewal application, or give written consent to the applicant or licensee pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 1033 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(b) This section shall apply to all licenses and registrations issued by the commissioner pursuant to this code, whether included in this chapter or in any other chapter of this code, and without regard to whether another chapter incorporates the requirements of this section by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 782, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Conduct of Licensee [1724. - 1736.5.]

1724.

An agent, broker, or solicitor who is not an active member of the State Bar of California may not share a commission or other compensation with an active member of the State Bar of California. For purposes of this section, “commission or other compensation” means pecuniary or nonpecuniary compensation of any kind relating to the sale or renewal of an insurance policy or certificate or an annuity, including, but not limited to, a bonus, gift, prize, award, or finder’s fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 547, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1724.5.

Every individual and organization licensee and every applicant for a license shall file with the commissioner in writing the true name of the individual or organization and also all fictitious names under which an individual or organization conducts or intends to conduct business and after licensing shall file with the commissioner any change in or discontinuance of those names. The commissioner may in writing disapprove the use of any true or fictitious name (other than the bona fide natural name of an individual) by any licensee on any of the following grounds:

(a) The name is an interference with or is too similar to a name already filed and in use by another
 licensee;

(b) The use of the name may mislead the public in any respect;

(c) The name states, infers or implies that the licensee is an insurer, motor club, hospital service plan or entitled to engage in insurance activities not permitted under licenses held or applied for;

(d) The name states or implies that the licensee is an underwriter. This subdivision shall not prevent natural persons who are life licensees from describing themselves
 as an “underwriter” or from using the designation “Chartered Life Underwriter” if entitled thereto nor shall it prevent a natural person who is a fire and casualty licensee from using the designation “Chartered Property and Casualty Underwriter” if entitled thereto nor a producers trade association each member of which is also separately licensed from having a name containing the word underwriter; or

(e) The licensee has already filed and not discontinued the use of more than two names including the true name. This subdivision shall not prevent a licensee who has lawfully purchased or succeeded to the business or businesses of other licensees from using for each business not more than two additional names, true or fictitious, consisting of names used by the licensee’s predecessors in the conduct of those businesses.

A licensee may not use a true or fictitious name after being notified by the commissioner in writing that the use is contrary to this section. If the commissioner determines that there are facts in mitigation in connection with the continued use of the name the commissioner may permit its use for a specified reasonable period of time if in connection therewith the commissioner imposes conditions that will protect the public and achieve the purposes of this section. The permission and conditions shall be written.

The grounds specified in subdivisions (a), (c), and (d) shall not be applicable to the true name of any organization licensee
 that on October 1, 1961, holds under that name any type of license issued under this chapter (commencing with Section 1621) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831) of this part nor to any fictitious name in use on October 1, 1961, by any individual or organization holding any type of license issued under this chapter or Chapter 8 of this part on that date, provided the fictitious name is filed with the commissioner on or before January 2, 1962.

The ground specified in subdivisions (b) and (e) shall not be applicable to any licensee who, or which, on October 1, 1961, holds a license issued under this chapter or Chapter 8 of this part until on and after January 2, 1964.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 16.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1725.

A license to act as a resident property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, personal lines broker-agent, and limited lines automobile insurance agent shall be prominently displayed by the holder thereof in the license holder’s office in a manner whereby anyone may readily inspect it and ascertain both its currency and the capacity in which its holder is licensed to act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 17.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1725.5.

(a) A person licensed under Section 1625, 1625.5, 1625.55, 1626, 1758.1, 1765, 1800, 14020, or 15006, or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831), shall affix, type, or print on business cards, written price quotations for insurance products, and print advertisements distributed exclusively in this state for insurance products, its license number in a type size that is at least as large as any indicated telephone number, address, or fax number or in 12-point type, or in 8-point type for business cards, whichever is larger. If a licensee includes the names of multiple licensed organizations on a business card, written price quotation, or print advertisement distributed exclusively in this state, affixing, typing, or printing the license number of any
 one of the organizations complies with the requirements of this section.

(b) A person licensed under Section 1625, 1625.5, 1625.55, 1626, 1758.1, 1765, 14020, or 15006, or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831), shall affix, type, or print on business cards, written price quotations for insurance products, and print advertisements distributed in this state for insurance products, the word “Insurance” in a type size that is at least as large as the smallest telephone number or in 12-point type, or in 8-point type for business cards, whichever is larger.

(c) A person licensed under Section 1625, 1625.5, 1625.55, 1626, 1758.1, 1765, 14020, or 15006, or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831), shall include the person’s license number in the emails the person sends that involve an
 activity for which a license is required. A person’s license number shall be in a type size that is no smaller than the largest of any telephone number, street address, or email address of the person included in the email. The license number of an individual licensee shall appear adjacent to or on the line below the individual’s name or title. The license number of an organizational licensee shall appear adjacent to or on the line below the organization’s name if the email is sent from the organization and not an individual licensee, and the communication involves an activity for which a license is required.

(d) A natural person who is a solicitor, as defined in Section 1624, working exclusively as an employee of a motor club agent, or working exclusively for a property
 broker-agent or casualty broker-agent on behalf of a motor club, shall use the organizational licensee number of that person’s employer.

(e) A person in violation of this section shall be subject to a fine levied by the commissioner in the amount of two hundred dollars ($200) for the first offense, five hundred dollars ($500) for the second offense, and one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the third and subsequent offenses. The penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for any one offense. These fines shall be deposited into the Insurance Fund.

(f) A separate penalty shall not be imposed upon each piece of printed material that fails to conform to the requirements of this section.

(g) If the
 commissioner finds that the failure of a licensee to comply with the provisions of subdivision (a) or (b) is due to reasonable cause or circumstance beyond the licensee’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, the licensee may be relieved of the penalty in subdivision (e).

(h) A licensee seeking to be relieved of the penalty in subdivision (e) shall file with the department a statement with supporting documents setting forth the facts upon which the licensee bases its claims for relief.

(i) This section does not apply to a person or entity that is not currently required to be licensed by the department or that is exempted from licensure.

(j) This
 section does not apply to general advertisements of motor clubs that merely list insurance products as one of several services offered by the motor club, and do not provide any details of the insurance products.

(k) This section does not apply to life insurance policy illustrations required by Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 10509.950) of Part 2 of Division 2 or to life insurance cost indexes required by Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 10509.970) of Part 2 of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.   (AB 1578)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1726.

(a) A person who is licensed in this state as an insurance agent or broker, advertises insurance on the internet, and transacts insurance in this state, shall identify all of the following information in the same size type on the person’s internet website home page or in a prominently displayed link from the home page, regardless of whether the insurance agent or broker maintains the internet presence or if the presence is maintained on the person’s behalf:

(1) The person’s name as filed with the commissioner that has not been disapproved pursuant to Section 1724.5.

(2) The person’s state of domicile and
 principal place of business.

(3) The person’s California insurance license number.

(4) The word “insurance.”

(b) A person shall be deemed to be transacting insurance in this state when the person advertises on the internet, regardless of whether the insurance agent or broker maintains the internet presence or if it is maintained on the person’s behalf, and does any of the following:

(1) Solicits a California resident.

(2) Provides an insurance premium quote to a California resident.

(3) Accepts an application for coverage from a
 California resident.

(4) Communicates with a California resident regarding one or more terms of an agreement to provide insurance or an insurance policy.

(5) Enters into negotiations before executing an insurance contract with a California resident.

(6) Executes an insurance contract with a California resident.

(7) Transacts matters after executing an insurance contract with a California resident that arise out of that contract.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed in (Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 201, Sec. 7.   (AB 1813)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1727.
